Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.160

Conducting activity without license.

Any person who conducts any activity for which a license is required by this chapter, or by rule of the commission, without the required license issued by the commission shall be guilty of a class B felony. If any corporation conducts any activity for which a license is required by this chapter, or by rule of the commission, without the required license issued by the commission, it may be punished by forfeiture of its corporate charter, in addition to the other penalties set forth in this section.

[ 1991 c 261 s 3; 1975 1st ex.s. c 166 s 9; 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 16.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 166: See note following RCW 9.46.090.